Louisiana, session 2026, SB128.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 47:818.52(D), the introductory
paragraph of 1516.1(B), 1562(A), 1565(A), 1566(B), and the introductory paragraph of
1602(D)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§818.52. Fuel use violations; penalty
* * *
D. Upon issuance of the violation ticket by the secretary or his authorized
designee or any weights and standard police officer or any motor carrier safety police
officer, the secretary will send a notice of fine by certified mail to the address listed
on the violation report, or to the taxpayer's last known address, or to any address
obtainable from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or
from any federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the
United States Postal Service or from United States Postal Service certified software.
The procedure for collection, payment, and enforcement of the fine assessed shall be
as follows:
* * *
§1516.1. In-state debt collection
* * *
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 128 ENROLLED
B. Once an obligation has become collectible by distraint and sale, as
provided in this Chapter, the secretary shall send a notice to the taxpayer at the
address given in the last report filed by said taxpayer, or to any address obtainable
from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or from any
federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the United
States Postal Service or from United States Postal Service certified software
informing him of the following:
* * *
§1562. Determination and notice of tax due
A. If a taxpayer fails to make and file any return or report required by the
provisions of this Subtitle, the secretary shall determine the tax, penalty, and interest
due by estimate or otherwise. Having determined the amount of tax, penalty, and
interest due, the secretary shall send by mail a notice to the taxpayer at the address
given in the last report filed by him pursuant to the provisions of the Chapter
governing the tax involved, or to any address that may be obtainable from any
private entity which will provide such address free of charge or from any federal,
state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the United States Postal
Service or from United States Postal Service certified software, setting out his
determination and informing the person of his purpose to assess the amount so
determined against him after thirty calendar days from the date of the notice.
* * *
§1565. Notice of assessment and right to appeal
A. Having assessed the amount determined to be due, the secretary shall send
a notice by certified mail to the taxpayer against whom the assessment is imposed
at the address given in the last report filed by the taxpayer, or to any address
obtainable from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or
from any federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the
United States Postal Service or from United States Postal Service certified software.
However, if the notice is to be mailed to an address outside the United States, the
secretary shall send notice by First-Class Mail International with Electronic United
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 128 ENROLLED
States Postal Service Delivery Confirmation. If no report has been timely filed, the
secretary shall send a notice by certified mail to the taxpayer against whom the
assessment is imposed at any address obtainable from any private entity which will
provide such address free of charge or from any federal, state, or local government
entity, including but not limited to the United States Postal Service or from United
States Postal service certified software. However, if the notice is to be mailed to an
address outside the United States, the secretary shall send notice by First-Class Mail
International with Electronic United States Postal Service Delivery Confirmation.
This notice shall inform the taxpayer of the assessment and that he has sixty calendar
days from the date of the notice to either pay the amount of the assessment or to
appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals for a redetermination of the assessment. All such
appeals shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 17 of this
Subtitle.
* * *
§1566. Assessment and notice when tax is in jeopardy
* * *
B. As soon as is feasible after such assessment, and not later than two
calendar days thereafter, the secretary shall send by certified mail a notice to the
taxpayer against whom the assessment lies, at the address given in the last report
filed by said taxpayer, or to any such address as may be obtainable from any private
entity which will provide such address free of charge or from any federal, state, or
local government entity, including but not limited to the United States Postal Service
or from United States Postal Service certified software. However, if the notice is to
be mailed to an address outside of the United States, the secretary shall send notice
by First-Class Mail International with Electronic USPS Delivery Confirmation. Such
notice shall inform the taxpayer of the assessment, its basis, and its jeopardous
nature; make demand for immediate payment thereof; and give notice that any
property distrained or to be distrained will be subject to sale, as provided in this
Chapter, to satisfy the assessment.
* * *
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 128 ENROLLED
§1602. Penalty for failure to make timely return; penalties related to nonpayment or
underpayment
* * *
D.(1) * * *
(2) The secretary shall send a notice by certified mail to the taxpayer at the
address given in the last report filed by the taxpayer, or to any address obtainable
from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or from any
federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the United
States Postal Service or from United States Postal Service certified software
informing him of the following:
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.